District of Columbia statutes.
31-2008

Confidentiality; prohibition on announcements; prohibition on use in ratemaking.

(a)

All RBC Reports (to the extent the information therein is not required to be set forth in a publicly available annual statement schedule) and RBC Plans (including the results or report of any examination or analysis of an insurer performed pursuant hereto and any Corrective Order issued by the Commissioner pursuant to examination or analysis) with respect to any domestic insurer or foreign insurer that are in the possession or control of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking shall be confidential and privileged; shall not be subject to subchapter II of Chapter 5 of Title 2; shall not be subject to subpoena; and shall not be subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in a private civil action; provided, that the Commissioner may use the documents, materials, or other information in the furtherance of any regulatory or legal action brought as a part of the Commissioner’s official duties. This information is also exempt from any applicable freedom of information law, public records law, public records disclosure law, or other similar statute.

(a-1)

The Commissioner or any person who received documents, materials, or other information while acting under the authority of the Commissioner shall not be permitted or required to testify in a private civil action concerning confidential documents, materials, or other information subject to subsection (a) of this section.

(a-2)

To assist in the performance of the Commissioner’s duties, the Commissioner:

(1)

May share documents, materials, or other information, including the confidential and privileged documents, materials, or other information subject to subsection (a) of this section, with other state, federal, and international regulatory agencies; with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, including its affiliates and subsidiaries; and with state, federal and international law enforcement authorities; provided, that the recipient agrees, and has the legal authority, to maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the documents, materials, or other information;

(2)

May receive documents, materials, or other information, including otherwise confidential and privileged documents, materials, or other information, from the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, and its affiliates and subsidiaries, and from regulatory and law enforcement officials of other foreign or domestic jurisdictions, and shall maintain as confidential or privileged any document, material, or other information received with notice or the understanding that it is confidential or privileged under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the document, material, or other information; or

(3)

May enter into agreements governing the sharing and use of information consistent with this section.

(a-3)

No waiver of an applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality in the documents, materials, or other information shall occur as a result of disclosure to the Commissioner under this section or as a result of sharing as authorized in subsection (a-2) of this section. Nothing in this section shall require an insurer to disclose documents, materials, or other information that is not otherwise required by law to be disclosed.

(b)

Except as otherwise required under the provisions of this chapter, the making, publishing, disseminating, circulating, or placing before the public, or causing, directly or indirectly to be made, published, disseminated, circulated, or placed before the public, in a newspaper, magazine, or other publication, or in the form of a notice, circular, pamphlet, letter, or poster, or over any radio or television station, or in any other way, an advertisement, announcement, or statement containing an assertion, representation, or statement with regard to the RBC Levels of any insurer, or of any component derived in the calculation, by any insurer, agent, broker, or other person engaged in any manner in the insurance business would be misleading and is therefore prohibited; provided, however, that if any materially false statement with respect to the comparison regarding an insurer’s total adjusted capital to its RBC Levels (or any of them) or an inappropriate comparison of any other amount to the insurers’ RBC Levels is published in any written publication and the insurer is able to demonstrate to the Commissioner with substantial proof the falsity of such statement, or the inappropriateness, as the case may be, then the insurer may publish an announcement in a written publication if the sole purpose of the announcement is to rebut the materially false statement.

(c)

The RBC Instructions, RBC Reports, Adjusted RBC Reports, RBC Plans and Revised RBC Plans shall not be used by the Commissioner for ratemaking nor considered or introduced as evidence in any rate proceeding nor used by the Commissioner to calculate or derive any elements of an appropriate premium level or rate of return for any line of insurance which an insurer or any affiliate is authorized to write.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-233, § 9, 44 DCR 765
Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-191, § 4, 47 DCR 7311
June 11, 2004, D.C. Law 15-166, § 4(l)(2), 51 DCR 2817

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-2003.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-4608.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-191 rewrote subsec. (a) and added subsecs. (a-1) to (a-3). Prior to amendment, subsec. (a) provided: “(a) All RBC Reports (to the extent the information therein is not required to be set forth in a publicly available annual statement schedule) and RBC Plans (including the results or report of any examination or analysis of an insurer performed pursuant hereto and any Corrective Order issued by the Commissioner pursuant to examination or analysis) with respect to any domestic insurer or foreign insurer which are filed with the Commissioner constitute information that might be damaging to the insurer if made available to its competitors, and therefore shall be kept confidential by the Commissioner. This information shall not be made public or be subject to subpoena, other than by the Commissioner and then only for the purpose of enforcement actions taken by the Commissioner pursuant to this chapter or any other provision of the insurance laws of the District. This information is also exempt from any applicable freedom of information law, public records law, public records disclosure law, or other similar statute.”
D.C. Law 15-166, in subsec. (a), substituted “Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking” for “Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(l)(2) of Consolidation of Financial Services Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-381, February 27, 2004, 51 DCR 2653).